Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.060

Answer—Contents.

The defendant shall set forth in his or her answer, the nature, and extent of his or her interest in the property, and if he or she be a lien creditor, how such lien was created, the amount of the debt secured thereby and remaining due, and whether such debt is secured in any other way, and if so, the nature of such other security.

[ 2011 c 336 s 222; Code 1881 s 557; 1877 p 118 s 562; 1869 p 134 s 510; RRS s 843.]